ja: 混凝紙で作る形状: 動物; ボックス; 人形; レター; マスク; 数字; 装飾品; 形状; その他
bg-BG: Формичка от папие-маше: Животно; Кутия; Фигурка; Писмо; Маска; Номер; Орнамент; Форма; Други
pt-PT: Forma de papel maché: Animal; Caixa; Figurino; Carta; Máscara; Número; Ornamento; Forma; Outro
hr-HR: Oblik kaširanog proizvoda: Životinja; Kutija; Figurica; Pismo; Maska; Broj; Ukras; Oblik; Ostalo
fr: Forme en papier mâché: Animal; Boîte; Figurine; Lettre; Masque; Nombre; Ornement; Forme; Autre
en: Papier mache shape: Animal; Box; Figurine; Letter; Mask; Number; Ornament; Shape; Other
zh-CN: 纸浆形状: 动物; 箱; 塑像; 信纸; 面具; 数字; 装饰品; 形状; 其他
sl-SI: Papier mache oblika: Žival; Pravokotna; Figura; Črka; Maska; Številka; Okras; Oblika; Drugo
da: Papmachéform: Dyr; Boks; Statue; Brev; Maske; Nummer; Ornament; Form; Andet
it: Forma della cartapesta: Animale; Scatola; Figurina; Lettera; Maschera; Numero; Ornamento; Forma; Altro
el: Σχήμα χαρτοπολτού: Ζώο; Κουτί; Ειδώλιο; Γράμμα; Μάσκα; Αριθμός; Στολίδι; Σχήμα; Άλλο
ru: Форма изделий из папье-маше: Животное; Коробка; Статуэтка; Буква; Маска; Цифра; Орнамент; Форма; Другой
fi: Paperimassa­n muoto: Eläin; Laatikko; Hahmo; Kirje; Maski; Numero; Ornamentti; Muoto; Muu
nl: Vorm van papier-maché: Dier; Box; Beeldje; Letter; Masker; Nummer; Ornament; Vorm; Andere
es: Forma de papel maché: Animal; Caja; Figura; Carta; Mascarilla; Número; Ornamento; Forma; Otros
sk-SK: Tvar papierovej drviny: Zviera; Škatuľa; Figúrka; List; Maska; Číslo; Ornament; Tvar; Iné
ko: 종이 반죽 모양: 동물; 상자; 작은 조각상; 레터; 마스크; 숫자; 오너먼트; 모양; 기타
pt-BR: Forma de papel machê: Animal; Caixa; Figurino; Carta; Máscara; Número; Ornamento; Forma; Outro
sv: Papier-maché-form: Djur; Låda; Statyett; Brev; Mask; Siffra; Ornament; Form; Övrigt
de: Form des Pappmaschees: Tier; Kasten; Figur; Letter; Maske; Zahl; Ornament; Form; Sonstiges
tr: Kağıt mamuru modeli: Hayvan; Kutu; Heykelcik; Mektup; Maske; Sayı; Süs; Şekil; Diğer
pl: Kształt papier-mache: Zwierzęcy; Pudło; Figurka; Letter; Maska; Liczba; Ornament; Kształt; Inne
vi: Hình dạng giấy bồi: Động vật; Hộp; Tượng nhỏ; Letter; Mặt nạ; Số; Vật trang trí; Hình dạng; Khác
zh-TW: 混凝紙形狀: 動物; 盒; 塑像; Letter; 面具; 數位; 裝飾品; 形狀; 其他
cs: Tvar z papírmaše: Zvíře; Krabice; Figurka; Letter; Maska; Číslo; Ornament; Tvar; Jiné
ro-RO: Formă papier mâché: Animal; Cutie; Figurină; Literă; Mască; Număr; Ornament; Formă; Altele
hu: Papírmasé formája: Állat; Doboz; Figura; Betű; Maszk; Szám; Dísz; Forma; Egyéb
lt-LT: Papjė mašė forma: Gyvūnas; Dėžutė; Figūrėlė; Raidė; Kaukė; Skaičius; Žaisliukas; Forma; Kita
nb: Papirmasjéformer: Dyr; Eske; Figur; Brev; Maske; Antall; Ornament; Form; Annet
th: รูปร่างของเปเปอร์มาเช่: สัตว์; กล่อง; หุ่นตัวเล็ก; จดหมาย; หน้ากาก; ตัวเลข; เครื่องประดับ; รูปร่าง; อื่นๆ